District of Columbia statutes.
50-2206.33

Operating a watercraft while impaired.

No person shall operate or be in physical control of any watercraft in the District while the person’s ability to operate a watercraft in the District is impaired by the consumption of alcohol or any drug or any combination thereof.

History

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 3l
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 103(e)(3), 59 DCR 12957

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-2206.32, § 50-2206.34, and § 50-2206.54.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 added this section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 103(e)(3) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).